Hawaii statutes.
[§435C-1] Purpose. The purpose of this
chapter is to provide a contingency plan to be instituted by the insurance
commissioner upon the unavailability of medical malpractice insurance in this
State. [L 1975, c 161, pt of §1]

Cross References

Medical torts, see chapter 671.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next